Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2512
Interagency planning team; members; duties; Department of Health and Human Services; provide services coordination.

Each region established pursuant to section 79-1135 shall establish an interagency planning team, which planning team shall include representatives from school districts, social services, health and medical services, parents, and mental health, developmental disabilities, Head Start, and other relevant agencies or persons serving children from birth to age five and their families and parents or guardians. Each interagency planning team shall be responsible for assisting in the planning and implementation of the Early Intervention Act in each local community or region. The Department of Health and Human Services, in collaboration with each regional interagency planning team, shall provide or contract for services coordination.

Laws 1991, LB 701, § 11;

Laws 1993, LB 520, § 18;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 1050;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 217;

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 61;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 146.